Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1890.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XIV-CSCRATCH COOKED MEALS FOR STUDENTSPILOT GRANT PROGRAMSection 1401-C. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Education of the 12345678910111213141516171819 Commonwealth."Local education agency." A school district, charter school, area career and technical school or intermediate unit."Pilot program." The Scratch Cooked Meals for Students Pilot Grant Program established under section 1402-C."Scratch cooking." The preparation of food using ingredients that are unprocessed or minimally processed.Section 1402-C. Pilot program.(a) Establishment.--The Scratch Cooked Meals for Students Pilot Grant Program is established in the department. The department shall establish guidelines and procedures necessary for the implementation and administration of the pilot program.(b) Expiration.--The pilot program shall expire four years from the effective date of this subsection.(c) Grant awards.--A grant awarded under the pilot program shall be made for a period of two school years.(d) Eligibility.--A local education agency may submit an application to the department for a grant under the pilot program. The application must include:(1) A needs assessment to evaluate equipment needs, equipment utilization, procurement process and workforce capabilities for the pilot program.(2) A strategic plan identifying:(i) How the local education agency will use the grant funding.(ii) How project activities will be monitored and evaluated.(iii) All proposed costs with a clear explanation about how the costs were determined.(3) Other information required by the department.20250HB1890PN2355 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (e) Eligible uses for grant awards.--Grants shall be used by a local education agency to promote scratch cooking, which may include:(1) Promoting professional development and training related to preparing, procuring, advertising, serving and creating menus of meals made with scratch cooking.(2) Purchasing cafeteria equipment or making infrastructure modifications necessary for scratch cooking.(3) Hiring of staff or third-party entities needed for additional food preparation necessary for scratch cooking.(4) Providing technical assistance, pupil engagement and education related to scratch cooking such as taste tests, recipe development and culinary education.(5) Investing in software and technology systems for procurement to support scratch cooking.(6) Carrying out any additional activities to promote scratch cooking that will help local education agencies meet or exceed nutrition standards.(f) Priority.--In evaluating grant applications, the department shall give priority to local education agencies that serve the greatest proportion of students eligible for free or reduced-price lunch.Section 1403-C. Reporting requirement.(a) Local education agency.--No later than 180 days after the expiration of the pilot program, each local education agency that received a grant shall submit a report to the department that compares the change at the end of the grant period to the school year immediately preceding the beginning of the grant period, including:(1) Recipes prepared.20250HB1890PN2355 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Nutrient analysis information.(3) Invoices or bid lists identifying the cost of each ingredient or single item per meal served.(4) The number of staff, type of staff and time required to prepare each meal.(5) Salary and benefit rates for each food service employee involved in food preparation of selected meals.(6) Production record and meal counts.(7) Free and reduced-price meal eligibility and average daily lunch participation.(8) Any other information required by the department.(b) Department.--No later than one year following the expiration of the pilot program, the department shall submit a report to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the House of Representatives that includes at least the following information:(1) The number of and amount of grants.(2) The names of and reports provided by participating local education agencies.(3) Recommendations on the continuation or expansion of the pilot program.(4) Any other information required by the department.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1890PN2355 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425